Wisconsin, session 2025, AB777.
do enact as follows:AB777,13Section 1. 14.16 (9r) of the statutes is created to read:AB777,2,4414.16 (9r) Veterans Benefits Education Week. To inform veterans about 5the benefits to which they are entitled and assist veterans in maximizing their use 6of such benefits, the week of November that starts on Sunday and ends on Saturday 1and in which November 11 falls is designated “Veterans Benefits Education Week.” 2The governor shall issue annually a suitable proclamation for the observance of 3“Veterans Benefits Education Week” that highlights the benefits to which veterans 4are entitled.AB777,2,55